Hawaii statutes.
§612-4 Grounds of qualification and disqualification.
(a) A prospective juror is qualified to serve as a juror if the prospective
juror:

(1) Is a citizen of the United States and of the
State;

(2) Is at least eighteen years old;

(3) Is a resident of the circuit; and

(4) Is able to read, speak, and understand the
English language.

(b) A prospective juror is disqualified to
serve as a juror if the prospective juror:

(1) Is incapable, by reason of the prospective
juror's disability, of rendering satisfactory jury service; but a prospective
juror claiming this disqualification may be required to submit a physician's,
physician assistant's, or advanced practice registered nurse's certificate as
to the disability, and the certifying physician, physician assistant, or
advanced practice registered nurse is subject to inquiry by the court at its
discretion;

(2) Has been convicted of a felony in a state or
federal court and not pardoned; or

(3) Fails to meet the qualifications in subsection
(a). [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1996, c 168, §1; am L 2007, c
122, §3; am L 2009, c 151, §22; am L 2014, c 45, §15]

Cross References

Disqualification of judges, see §601-7.

Case Notes

A juror is not disqualified to sit in a murder trial because
juror is a remote connection by marriage of the deceased. 3 H. 381.

Person holding commission as special constable, unpaid, not
disqualified. 8 H. 10.

Reference to race permitted under prior laws. 5 H. 501.

Serving in jury not considered holding public office and
legislator qualified. 8 H. 434.

Juror's opinion formed on general talk leaving unconscious
tendency one way or another, or find juror has sufficient knowledge of English
though unable to define "impartial", etc. 20 H. 7. Examination on
voir dire, right to reject not to select. 30 H. 697.

Right to trial by jury, in partition. 30 H. 860. Dismissal
of appeal in circuit court does not infringe right to trial by jury. 30 H.
468. Action to quiet title, trial by jury. 28 H. 1, aff'd 7 F.2d 325. Demand
for trial by jury in prayer of complaint insufficient. 24 H. 777.

Membership in police force no disqualification. 187 F.2d
719.

Subdivision (1) does not include sex. In the absence of a
showing of improper motive or injury to defendant, the fixing by the jury
commission of a ratio between men and women to be included on the jury list,
although irregular and not authorized by statute, does not warrant a quashal of
an indictment. 45 H. 247, 365 P.2d 460. Fact that jury commissioners rejected
for service with the grand jury persons convicted of misdemeanors though
rejection was not legally required, did not invalidate jury list. 105 F. Supp.
727. Jury competence is an individual rather than a group or class matter. Id.

Where prospective jurors were able to speak and understand
English, trial court properly refused to excuse jurors for cause. 80 H. 107,
905 P.2d 613 (1995).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next